Illinois, session 104th, SB2469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 311.6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/311.6)7    Sec. 311.6. Prescriptions for substance classified in 8Schedule II, III, IV, or V sent electronically; exceptions 9Opioid prescriptions.10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 11prescription for a substance classified in Schedule II, III, 12IV, or V must be sent electronically, in accordance with 13Section 316. Prescriptions sent in accordance with this 14subsection (a) must be accepted by the dispenser in electronic 15format.16    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2024 (the effective date of 17Public Act 103-425) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 18Assembly until December 31, 2028, notwithstanding any other 19provision of this Section or any other provision of law, a 20prescriber shall not be required to issue prescriptions 21electronically if he or she certifies to the Department of 22Financial and Professional Regulation that he or she will not 23issue more than 150 prescriptions during a 12-month period.   SB2469 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08825 RLC 18880 b1Prescriptions in both oral and written form for controlled 2substances shall be included in determining whether the 3prescriber will reach the limit of 150 prescriptions. 4Beginning January 1, 2029, notwithstanding any other provision 5of this Section or any other provision of law, a prescriber 6shall not be required to issue prescriptions electronically if 7he or she certifies to the Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation that he or she will not issue more 9than 50 prescriptions during a 12-month period. Prescriptions 10in both oral and written form for controlled substances shall 11be included in determining whether the prescriber will reach 12the limit of 50 prescriptions.13    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 14or any other provision of law, a prescriber shall not be 15required to issue prescriptions electronically under the 16following circumstances:17        (1) prior to January 1, 2026, the prescriber 18    demonstrates financial difficulties in buying or managing 19    an electronic prescription option, whether it is an 20    electronic health record or some other electronic 21    prescribing product;22        (2) on and after January 1, 2026, the prescriber 23    provides proof of a waiver from the Centers for Medicare 24    and Medicaid Services for the Electronic Prescribing for 25    Controlled Substances Program due to demonstrated economic 26    hardship for the previous compliance year;   SB2469 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08825 RLC 18880 b1        (3) there is a temporary technological or electrical 2    failure that prevents an electronic prescription from 3    being issued;4        (4) the prescription is for a drug that the 5    practitioner reasonably determines would be impractical 6    for the patient to obtain in a timely manner if prescribed 7    by an electronic data transmission prescription and the 8    delay would adversely impact the patient's medical 9    condition;10        (5) the prescription is for an individual who:11            (A) resides in a nursing or assisted living 12        facility;13            (B) is receiving hospice or palliative care;14            (C) is receiving care at an outpatient renal 15        dialysis facility and the prescription is related to 16        the care provided;17            (D) is receiving care through the United States 18        Department of Veterans Affairs; or19            (E) is incarcerated in a state, detained, or 20        confined in a correctional facility;21        (6) the prescription prescribes a drug under a 22    research protocol;23        (7) the prescription is a non-patient specific 24    prescription dispensed under a standing order, approved 25    protocol for drug therapy, collaborative drug management, 26    or comprehensive medication management, or in response to   SB2469 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08825 RLC 18880 b1    a public health emergency or other circumstance in which 2    the practitioner may issue a non-patient specific 3    prescription;4        (8) the prescription is issued when the prescriber and 5    dispenser are the same entity;6        (9) the prescription is issued for a compound 7    prescription containing 2 or more compounds; or8        (10) the prescription is issued by a licensed 9    veterinarian within 7 2 years after November 17, 2023 ( 10    the effective date of Public Act 103-563) this amendatory 11    Act of the 103rd General Assembly.12    (c) The Department of Financial and Professional 13Regulation may adopt rules for the administration of this 14Section to the requirements under this Section that the 15Department of Financial and Professional Regulation may deem 16appropriate.17    (d) Any prescriber who makes a good faith effort to 18prescribe electronically, but for reasons not within the 19prescriber's control is unable to prescribe electronically, 20may be exempt from any disciplinary action.21    (e) Any pharmacist who dispenses in good faith based upon 22a valid prescription that is not prescribed electronically may 23be exempt from any disciplinary action. A pharmacist is not 24required to ensure or responsible for ensuring the 25prescriber's compliance under subsection (b), nor may any 26other entity or organization require a pharmacist to ensure   SB2469 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08825 RLC 18880 b1the prescriber's compliance with that subsection. A pharmacist 2may not refuse to fill a valid prescription solely because it 3is not prescribed electronically. 4    (f) It shall be a violation of this Section for any 5prescriber or dispenser to adopt a policy contrary to this 6Section.7    (g) A compliance action with respect to this Section 8initiated by the Department of Financial and Professional 9Regulation prior to December 31, 2030 is limited to a 10non-disciplinary warning letter or citation, unless the 11prescriber or dispenser fails to abide by the initial 12non-disciplinary warning letter or citation, has acted in bad 13faith, or a pattern of practice in violation of this Section 14occurs. 15(Source: P.A. 102-490, eff. 1-1-24 (See Section 55 of P.A. 16102-1109 for effective date of P.A. 102-490); 103-425, eff. 171-1-24; 103-563, eff. 11-17-23; 103-732, eff. 8-2-24.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.